apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
    <pardef n="step__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ped</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ped</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ping</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ping</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ping</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="st/ick__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ick</l> 
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ick</l> 
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>icks</l> 
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uck</l> 
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uck</l> 
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>icking</l> 
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>icking</l> 
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>icking</l> 
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="str/ike__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ike</l> 
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ike</l> 
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikes</l> 
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uck</l> 
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uck</l> 
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iking</l> 
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iking</l> 
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iking</l> 
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sw/ell__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ell</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ell</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ells</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elled</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elled</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ollen</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elling</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elling</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elling</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sw/im__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>im</l> 
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>im</l> 
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ims</l> 
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>am</l> 
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>um</l> 
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imming</l> 
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imming</l> 
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imming</l> 
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/each__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>each</l> 
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>each</l> 
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eachs</l> 
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aught</l> 
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aught</l> 
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eaching</l> 
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eaching</l> 
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eaching</l> 
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tr/ead__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ead</l> 
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ead</l> 
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eads</l> 
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>od</l> 
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>od</l> 
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>odden</l> 
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eading</l> 
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eading</l> 
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eading</l> 
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="underl/ie__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ie</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ie</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ies</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ay</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aid</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="clap">
	    <i>clap</i> 
	    <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="clap hands">
	    <i>clap</i> 
	    <par n="step__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>hands</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>hands</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="clap my hands">
	    <i>clap</i> 
	    <par n="step__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>my<b/>hands</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>my<b/>hands</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="clap your hands">
	    <i>clap</i> 
	    <par n="step__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>your<b/>hands</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>your<b/>hands</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="clap our hands">
	    <i>clap</i> 
	    <par n="step__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>our<b/>hands</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>our<b/>hands</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="clap their hands">
	    <i>clap</i> 
	    <par n="step__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>their<b/>hands</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>their<b/>hands</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="drop">
        <i>drop</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="equip">
        <i>equip</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="flip">
	    <i>flip</i> 
	    <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="flip over">
	    <i>flip</i> 
	    <par n="step__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
            <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>  
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>over</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>over</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="kidnap">
        <i>kidnap</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="pop">
        <i>pop</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="rip">
        <i>rip</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="ship">
        <i>ship</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="skip">
	    <i>skip</i> 
	    <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="slip">
        <i>slip</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="stick">
        <i>st</i> 
        <par n="st/ick__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="step">
        <i>step</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="step into">
        <i>step</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>into</l> 
        <r><g><b/>into</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="stop">
        <i>stop</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="strike">
        <i>str</i> 
	<par n="str/ike__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="strip">
        <i>strip</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="swim">
        <i>sw</i> 
        <par n="sw/im__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="teach">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="t/each__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="tap">
        <i>tap</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="tip">
        <i>tip</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="top">
        <i>top</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="trap">
        <i>trap</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="wrap">
        <i>wrap</i> 
        <par n="step__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="trip"><i>trip</i><par n="step__vblex"/>    </e>
